Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2024 Act  is added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Generic equivalent” means a drug that meets applicable standards of strength,
quality and purity according to the United  States Pharmacopeia or other nationally recog-
nized compendium and that, compared to a brand name drug:
(i) Has an  identical amount of the same active chemical ingredients and the same dosage
form; and
(ii) If administered in the same amounts, will provide comparable therapeutic effects.
(B) “Generic equivalent” does not include a drug  that is listed by the United States Food
and Drug Administration as  having unresolved bioequivalence concerns according to the
administration’s most recent publication of approved drug  products with therapeutic equiv-
alence evaluations.
(b)(A) “Health plan” means:
(i) An individual or group health benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005;
(ii) A plan providing coverage for a specific disease or condition only;
(iii) A medical services contract; or
(iv) Another  similar certificate, policy, contract or arrangement or any endorsement or
rider that covers all or a portion of the cost of an individual’s health  care and that is subject
to regulation by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(B) “Health plan” does not include coverages provided by:
(i) Medicare;
(ii) The state medical assistance program;
(iii) The federal government to federal employees;
(iv) TRICARE;
(v) Workers’ compensation;
(vi) Limited benefit coverage;
(vii) Accident only, credit, disability or long term care insurance; or
Enrolled House Bill 4113 (HB 4113-A) Page 1
(viii) A health  benefit plan offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon
Educators Benefit Board through a commercial insurer, health care  service contractor or a
third party administrator.
(c) “High deductible health plan” means a health plan described in 26 U.S.C. 223.
(d) “Person” includes:
(A) An individual;
(B) A trust;
(C) An estate;
(D) A partnership;
(E) A corporation;
(F) An association;
(G) A joint stock company;
(H) An insurance company;
(I) A state;
(J) A political subdivision, instrumentality or municipal corporation of a state; or
(K) A nonprofit organization.
(e) “Pharmacy benefit manager” means a pharmacy benefit manager, as defined  in ORS
735.530, that manages pharmacy benefits for a health plan.
(f) “Preventive services” has the meaning given that term in 42 U.S.C. 1395x.
(2) To the extent permitted by federal  law, an insurer offering a health plan that provides
pharmacy benefits and a pharmacy benefit manager  shall include all amounts paid by an
enrollee or paid by another person on behalf of an enrollee toward the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the enrollee’s contribution to an out-of-pocket maximum,
deductible, copayment, coinsurance or other  cost-sharing requirement applied to the drug if:
(a) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
(b) The drug has a generic equivalent and the enrollee has:
(A) Obtained prior authorization from the insurer or pharmacy benefit manager;
(B) Complied with a step therapy protocol; or
(C) Received approval from the insurer  or pharmacy benefit manager through the
insurer’s or the pharmacy benefit manager’s exceptions, appeal or review process.
(3) For high deductible health plans, the  provisions of subsection (2) of this section apply
only to preventive  services until the enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible under 26
U.S.C. 223(c)(2).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 743B.001 is amended to read:
743B.001. As  used in this section and ORS 743.008, 743.029, 743.035, 743A.190, 743B.195,
743B.197, 743B.200, 743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220,  743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.310,  743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.405, 743B.420,
743B.422, 743B.423, 743B.424, 743B.450, 743B.451,  743B.452, 743B.453, 743B.454, 743B.505, 743B.550,
743B.555 and 743B.602 and section 2 of this 2024 Act :
(1) “Adverse  benefit determination” means an insurer’s denial, reduction or termination of a
health care item or service, or an insurer’s failure or refusal to  provide or to make a payment in
whole or in part for a health care item or service, that is based on the insurer’s:
(a) Denial of eligibility for or termination of enrollment in a health benefit plan;
(b) Rescission or cancellation of a policy or certificate;
(c) Imposition of a preexisting condition exclusion as defined in ORS 743B.005,  source-of-injury
exclusion,  network  exclusion, annual benefit limit or other limitation on otherwise covered items
or services;
(d) Determination  that a health care item or service is experimental, investigational or not
medically necessary, effective or appropriate;
(e) Determination that a course or  plan of treatment that an enrollee is undergoing is an active
course of treatment for purposes of continuity of care under ORS 743B.225; or
Enrolled House Bill 4113 (HB 4113-A) Page 2
(f) Denial, in whole  or in part, of a request for prior authorization, a request for an exception
to step therapy or a request for coverage of  a treatment, drug, device or diagnostic or laboratory
test that is subject to other utilization review requirements.
(2) “Authorized representative” means an individual who by law or by the consent  of a person
may act on behalf of the person.
(3) “Clinical review criteria” means screening procedures, decision rules, medical  protocols and
clinical guidance used by an insurer or other entity in conducting utilization review and evaluating:
(a) Medical necessity;
(b) Appropriateness of an  item or health service for which prior authorization is requested or
for which an exception to step therapy has been requested as described in ORS 743B.602; or
(c) Any other coverage that is subject to utilization review.
(4) “Credit card” has the meaning given that term in 15 U.S.C. 1602.
(5) “Electronic funds transfer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 293.525.
(6) “Enrollee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(7) “Essential  community provider” has the meaning given that term in rules adopted by the
Department of Consumer and Business  Services consistent with the description of the term in 42
U.S.C. 18031 and the rules adopted by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
the United States Department of the Treasury  or the United States Department of Labor to carry
out 42 U.S.C. 18031.
(8) “Grievance” means:
(a) A communication from an enrollee  or an authorized representative of an enrollee expressing
dissatisfaction with an adverse benefit  determination, without specifically declining any right to
appeal or review, that is:
(A) In writing, for an internal appeal or an external review; or
(B) In writing  or orally, for an expedited response described in ORS 743B.250 (2)(d) or an expe-
dited external review; or
(b) A written complaint submitted by an enrollee or  an authorized representative of an enrollee
regarding  the:
(A) Availability, delivery or quality of a health care service;
(B) Claims payment, handling or reimbursement for health care services and,  unless the enrollee
has not submitted a request for an internal appeal, the complaint is not  disputing an adverse benefit
determination; or
(C) Matters pertaining to the contractual relationship between an enrollee and an insurer.
(9) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(10) “Independent practice association” means  a corporation wholly owned by providers, or
whose membership consists entirely of providers, formed for the sole purpose  of contracting with
insurers for the provision of health care services to enrollees, or with employers for  the provision
of health care services to employees, or  with a group, as described in ORS 731.098, to provide health
care services to group members.
(11) “Insurer” includes a health care service contractor as defined in ORS 750.005.
(12) “Internal appeal”  means a review by an insurer of an adverse benefit determination made
by the insurer.
(13) “Managed health insurance” means any health benefit plan that:
(a) Requires an enrollee to use a specified network  or networks of providers managed, owned,
under contract with or employed by the  insurer in order to receive benefits under the plan, except
for emergency or other specified limited service; or
(b) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection, offers  a point-of-service
provision that allows an enrollee  to use providers outside of the specified network or networks at
the option of the enrollee and receive a reduced level of benefits.
(14) “Medical services contract” means a contract between an insurer  and an independent
practice association, between an insurer and a provider, between an independent practice  associ-
ation and a provider or organization of providers, between medical or mental  health clinics, and
Enrolled House Bill 4113 (HB 4113-A) Page 3
between a medical or mental health clinic and a provider to provide medical or  mental health ser-
vices. “Medical services contract” does not include a contract of employment or a  contract creating
legal entities and ownership thereof that are authorized under ORS  chapter 58, 60 or 70, or other
similar professional organizations permitted by statute.
(15)(a) “Preferred provider organization insurance” means any health benefit plan that:
(A) Specifies a preferred network of providers managed, owned or under contract with  or em-
ployed by an insurer;
(B) Does  not require an enrollee to use the preferred network of providers in order to receive
benefits under the plan; and
(C) Creates financial incentives  for an enrollee to use the preferred network of providers by
providing an increased level of benefits.
(b) “Preferred provider organization  insurance” does not mean a health benefit plan that has
as its sole financial incentive  a hold harmless provision under which providers in the preferred
network agree to accept as payment in full the maximum allowable amounts that are specified  in
the medical services contracts.
(16) “Prior authorization” means a form of utilization review that requires a provider or an
enrollee to request a determination by an insurer, prior to the provision of health care  that is sub-
ject to utilization review, that the insurer will provide reimbursement for the health care requested.
“Prior authorization” does not include referral approval  for evaluation and management services
between providers.
(17)(a) “Provider” means a person licensed, certified or otherwise authorized  or permitted by
laws of this state to administer medical or mental health services in the ordinary course of  business
or practice of a profession.
(b) With respect to the statutes governing the  billing for or payment of claims, “provider” also
includes an employee or other designee of the provider who  has the responsibility for billing claims
for reimbursement or receiving payments on claims.
(18) “Step therapy” means a utilization review protocol,  policy or program in which an insurer
requires certain preferred drugs for treatment of a specific medical  condition be proven ineffective
or contraindicated before a prescribed drug may be reimbursed.
(19) “Utilization review” means a set of formal  techniques used by an insurer or delegated by
the insurer  designed to monitor the use of or evaluate the medical necessity, appropriateness, effi-
cacy or efficiency of health care items, services, procedures or settings.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 750.055 is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply  to health care service contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454, 731.485, as provided in subsection (2)  of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504, 731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to  731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230,  732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and 732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS 733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and  733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050, 743.100  to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788, 743.790 and 743B.221.
Enrolled House Bill 4113 (HB 4113-A) Page 4
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014, 743A.020,  743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100,  743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175,  743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013.
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195,  743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222, 743B.225,  743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253, 743B.254,
743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310, 743B.320,
743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407,
743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452, 743B.453,  743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505, 743B.550,
743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800 and section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to  744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the Insurance Code apply to  health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group  practice health maintenance organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the  group practice health maintenance organization wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred  by a physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws of the other state is  subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose  of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s classification as  a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 5.
 ORS  750.055, as amended by section 21, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013, section
7, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2014, section 82, chapter 45, Oregon Laws 2014, section 9, chapter 59,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 100, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2015, section 11, chapter 362, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 470, Oregon Laws  2015, section
30, chapter 515, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 206,  Oregon Laws 2017, section 6, chapter
417, Oregon Laws  2017, section 22, chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2017, section 10, chapter 7, Oregon
Laws 2018, section 69, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2019, section 38, chapter  151, Oregon Laws 2019,
section 5, chapter 441, Oregon Laws 2019, section 85, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2021,  section 12,
chapter 37, Oregon Laws 2022, section 5, chapter  111, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 152,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply to health care service  contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
Enrolled House Bill 4113 (HB 4113-A) Page 5
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454,  731.485, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504,  731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230,  732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and 732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS 733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and  733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050, 743.100  to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788, 743.790 and 743B.221.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014, 743A.020,  743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100,  743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175, 743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260,  743A.310
and 743A.315.
(i) ORS 743B.001,  743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195, 743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222, 743B.225, 743B.227,  743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253, 743B.254,
743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310, 743B.320,
743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407,
743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505, 743B.550,
743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800 and section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation  of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the  Insurance Code apply to health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group practice health maintenance  organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the group practice health maintenance organization  wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred  by a physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws  of the other state is subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health  care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s  classification as a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
Enrolled House Bill 4113 (HB 4113-A) Page 6
(6) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services  may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 6. Section 2 of  this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 743B.001 and 750.055
by sections 3  to 5 of this 2024 Act apply to health plans, as defined in section 2 of this 2024
Act, and to  health care service contracts offered by health care service contractors, as de-
fined in ORS 750.005, issued, renewed or extended on or after the effective date of this 2024
Act.
Passed by House February 20, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4113 (HB 4113-A) Page 7